Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Chapter 10 State Advisory Council on Juvenile Justice

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, chs. 181 and 121, each enacted a chapter 9 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 121 have been redesignated as this chapter.

§ 14-10-101.
State advisory council on juvenile justice.

There is created within the office of the governor the state advisory council on juvenile justice. The advisory council shall consist of not less than fifteen (15) members appointed by the governor representing each judicial district. Each member shall serve a three (3) year term. The advisory council shall be made up of members having training, experience or special knowledge concerning the prevention and treatment of juvenile delinquency or the administration of juvenile justice.

The governor may remove any member of the advisory council as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Vacancies on the advisory council shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

The advisory council may meet four (4) or more times each year.

Members of the advisory council shall not receive compensation for their services, but when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, they shall receive travel expenses, per diem and mileage expenses in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

The advisory council shall:

Advise the governor in the development and review of the state’s juvenile justice planning;

Assist communities in the formation of community juvenile services boards;

Make recommendation for an equitable funding formula for distribution of funds to community juvenile service boards;

Be afforded the opportunity to review and comment on all juvenile justice, delinquency prevention and juvenile services grant applications prepared for submission under any federal grant program by any governmental entity of the state;

Review the progress and accomplishments of state and local juvenile justice, delinquency prevention and juvenile services projects;

At the direction of the governor, assist communities to collect, compile and distribute data relating to juvenile justice, delinquency prevention and juvenile services, including but not limited to, an inventory of programs and services available in each county of the state. The council shall then identify and make recommendations with regard to areas for which an unfulfilled need for services or programs exists;

Develop recommendations concerning establishments of priorities and needed improvements with respect to juvenile justice, delinquency prevention and juvenile services and report its recommendations to the governor and joint judiciary interim committee annually, on or before December 31;

Review and analyze the proposed budget for each entity of state government which utilizes state or federal funds to administer or provide juvenile justice programs and services and make recommendations to the governor; and

Coordinate the efficient and effective development and enhancement of state, local and regional juvenile justice programs.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 121, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “joint judiciary interim committee” for “legislature” in (f)(vii).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”